Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
ARTICLE 50.5
CONFINEMENT OF CALVES RAISED FOR
VEAL AND PREGNANT SOWS

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2008 act enacting this article, see section 1 of chapter 228, Session Laws of Colorado 2008.

Section

35-50.5-101. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Calf raised for veal" means a member of the bovine species kept for the purpose of producing the food product known as veal.

"Farrowing" means the process of a gestating sow giving birth to offspring.

"Farrowing unit" means a structure in which a single gestating sow is kept immediately prior to and during farrowing for the purposes of providing care to the sow and the sow's offspring.

"Gestating sow" means a confirmed pregnant member of the porcine species.

"Person" shall have the meaning set forth in section 2-4-401, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire article added, p. 861, § 2, effective May 14.

35-50.5-102. Confinement of calves raised for veal and pregnant sows - exceptions - penalty.

No person shall confine a calf raised for veal or gestating sow in any manner other than the following:

A calf raised for veal shall be kept in a manner that allows the calf to stand up, lie down, and turn around without touching the sides of its enclosure.

A gestating sow shall be kept in a manner that allows the sow to stand up, lie down, and turn around without touching the sides of its enclosure until no earlier than twelve days prior to the expected date of farrowing. At that time, a gestating sow may be kept in a farrowing unit.

This section shall not apply during the following:

Periods of scientific or agricultural research;

Examination, testing, or individual veterinary treatment;

Transportation;

Exhibitions at rodeos, fairs, or youth programs; or

Slaughter pursuant to article 33 of this title and rules adopted pursuant to article 33 of this title.

A person who violates any provision of this section commits a class 2 misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire article added, p. 862, § 2, effective May 14.

35-50.5-103. Applicability.

This article shall apply to:

Calves raised for veal, on and after January 1, 2012; and

Gestating sows, on and after January 1, 2018.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire article added, p. 862, § 2, effective May 14.